lt-LT: Gitaros slide apdaila: Padengtas; Matinis / apšerkšnijęs; Matinis; Dengtas metalu; Poliruotas; Tekstūruotas / su sukibimu; Kita
nl: Gitaarslide afwerking: Gecoat; Gematteerd; Mat; Geplateerd; Gepolijst; Getextureerd/grip; Overig
hu: Gitárcsúszka kivitele: Bevonatos; Mattított (Frosted); Matt; Fémezett; Polírozott; Texturált/tapadós; Egyéb
pl: Wykończenie slide’u gitarowego: Powlekane; Mrożone; Matowe; Platerowane; Polerowane; Teksturowane / Z uchwytem; Inne
ro-RO: Finisaj slide pentru chitară: Acoperit; Matifiat; Mat; Placat; Lustruit; Texturat/Aderență; Altele
tr: Gitar slide kaplaması: Kaplamalı; Buzlu; Mat; Kaplama; Cilalı; Dokulu/Tutuşlu; Diğer
da: Finish for slide til guitar: Belagt; Matteret; Mat; Pletteret; Poleret; Struktureret/greb; Andet
zh-CN: 吉他滑棒收尾: 涂层; 磨砂; 哑光; 电镀; 抛光; 纹理/防滑; 其他
sv: Slide för gitarr – finish: Belagd; Frostad; Matt; Pläterad; Polerad; Strukturerad/med grepp; Övrigt
ja: ギタースライド仕上げ: コーティング; フロスト; マット; メッキ; 研磨; テクスチャ/グリップ; その他
sk-SK: Úprava gitarového slajdu: Potiahnutý; Pieskovaný; Matný; Pokovovaný; Leštený; Textúrovaný/Grip; Iné
fr: Finition du bottleneck de guitare: Revêtu; Givré; Mat; Plaqué; Poli; Texturé/à adhérence; Autre
de: Finish des Gitarren-Slides: Beschichtet; Mattiert; Matt; Plattiert; Poliert; Texturiert/Grip; Sonstige
es: Acabado slide de guitarra: Recubierto; Esmerilado; Mate; Chapado; Pulido; Texturizado/con agarre; Otro
pt-BR: Guitarra slide acabamento: Revestido; Fosco; Opaco; Banhado; Polido; Texturizado/com aderência; Outro
th: จบด้วยการสไลด์กีตาร์: เคลือบผิว; ขัดฝ้า; เคลือบด้าน; ชุบโลหะ; ขัดเงา; มีพื้นผิว/กริป; อื่นๆ
el: Φινίρισμα slide κιθάρας: Με επίστρωση; Frosted (ματ); Ματ; Επιμεταλλωμένο; Γυαλισμένο; Ανάγλυφο/Με λαβή; Άλλο
hr-HR: Završetak slajda za gitaru: Premazano; Matirano; Mat; Presvučeno; Polirano; Teksturirano / za držanje; Ostalo
fi: Kitaran sliden viimeistely: Pinnoitettu; Huurrettu; Matta; Päällystetty; Kiillotettu; Teksturoitu/grippi; Muu
en: Guitar slide finish: Coated; Frosted; Matte; Plated; Polished; Textured/Grip; Other
pt-PT: Acabamento de slide de guitarra: Revestido; Fosco; Mate; Banhado; Polido; Texturado/aderência; Outro
bg-BG: Повърхност на слайда за китара: С покритие; Матиран; Мат; Покрит с метал; Полиран; Текстуриран/с грип; Други
sl-SI: Površinska obdelava kitarskega drsnika: Premazano; Matirano; Mat; Prevlečeno; Polirano; Teksturirano/z oprijemom; Drugo
ru: Отделка слайда для гитары: С покрытием; Матированная; Матовая; С гальваническим покрытием; Полированная; Текстурированная/с хватом; Другое
cs: Povrchová úprava slidu na kytaru: Potažený; Matovaný; Matný; Pokovený; Leštěný; Texturovaný/Grip; Ostatní
nb: Gitarslidefinish: Belagt; Frostet; Matt; Plettert; Polert; Teksturert/grep; Annet
zh-TW: 吉他滑棒表面處理: 有塗層; 磨砂; 霧面; 電鍍; 拋光; 紋理/防滑; 其他
it: Finitura dello slide per chitarra: Rivestito; Smerigliato; Opaco; Placcato; Lucidato; Strutturato/Grip; Altro
ko: 기타 슬라이드 마감: 코팅됨; 프로스트 처리됨; 무광; 도금됨; 연마됨; 질감/그립형; 기타
vi: Lớp hoàn thiện của slide guitar: Phủ lớp; Phủ mờ; Mờ; Mạ; Đánh bóng; Có kết cấu/Độ bám; Khác